Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5523.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2111a. (1) Notwithstanding section 2111, an automobile insurer may shall offer a premium discount to insureds 50 years of age and older who successfully complete a traffic accident prevention course that an automobile insurer determines meets all of the criteria listed in subsection (3). (2) An automobile insurer may shall provide the discount under subsection (1) for 3 years after successful completion of an initial or refresher traffic accident prevention course. (3) A traffic accident prevention course shall must provide for all of the following: (a) For an initial traffic accident prevention course, includes not less than 8 6 hours of classroom instruction taught by an instructor certified by the entity offering the course. For a refresher traffic accident prevention course, includes not less than 4 hours of classroom instruction taught by an instructor certified by the entity offering the course. (b) Includes, but is not limited to, instruction Instruction in, but that is not limited to, all of the following areas: (i) The effects of aging on driving behavior. (ii) The shapes, colors, and types of road signs. (iii) The effects of alcohol and other drugs, including medications, on older drivers. (iv) Laws relating to the proper use of a motor vehicle and safe driving behavior. (v) Traffic crash avoidance and prevention measures. (vi) The benefits and proper use of motor vehicle occupant protection systems. (vii) Major driving hazards and risk factors associated with traffic crash prevention. (viii) Interaction with other highway users, such as emergency vehicles, trucks, motorcyclists, bicyclists, and pedestrians. (c) Provides, upon On successful completion of the course, a certificate of completion that may be used in applying for an automobile insurance premium discount under subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act may be referred to as the "cutting auto rates for seniors, or CARS, act".